Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202654-1,138
Registered dairy heifer development facility; sections; how construed.

Sections 54-1,132 to 54-1,137 shall not be construed to prohibit the operation of nonqualified dairies.

Laws 2026, LB1187, § 24.
July 18, 2026